Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.120

Notice.

A copy of the petition, with a notice of the time and place of hearing, must be served upon the owner and the owner's attorney of record, if any, at least ten days before the hearing.

[ 1987 c 442 s 212; 1981 c 329 s 16; 1895 c 64 s 12; RRS s 540. Formerly RCW 6.12.170.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.